District of Columbia statutes.
47-895.33

Notices; collection; penalties.

(a)

The Energy Efficiency Loan Agreement shall require the property owner to consent to the levy of the Special Assessment on the lots, following which consent, all actions by any owner of the lot to challenge the levy of the Special Assessment shall be forever barred. The property owner that enters into an Energy Efficiency Loan Agreement and each subsequent owner of the lot shall provide notice to the buyer of the lot of the levy of the Special Assessment; provided, that the notice shall not apply to lots sold under Chapter 13A [of this title]. Failure to receive disclosure of the Special Assessment by a subsequent owner shall not relieve the subsequent owner of the obligation to pay the Special Assessment.

(b)

Special Assessments shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time as real property taxes are collected; provided, that the Special Assessments may be collected at a different time and in a different manner as determined by the Chief Financial Officer.

(b-1)

A notice, bill, or other correspondence under this subchapter or § 47-1336 shall be mailed to the owner’s specifically designated mailing address as provided in the energy efficiency loan closing documents and as may be updated from time to time by the Chief Financial Officer, which may be different from the general mailing address provided pursuant to § 42-405, or as provided in the transfer and recordation tax return.

(c)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an unpaid Special Assessment shall be subject to the same penalty and interest provisions as a delinquent real property tax under this chapter. A lien for an unpaid Special Assessment, including penalty and interest, shall attach to the real property in the same manner as, and with a priority immediately junior to, a lien for delinquent real property tax under Chapter 13A [of this title] and senior to all other liens. Real property sold at a tax sale for the failure to pay real property taxes shall remain subject to the obligation to pay Special Assessments in subsequent years as provided in this subchapter. The unpaid Special Assessment shall be collected pursuant to section 47-1336.

(2)

If an interest in or use of a lot is subject to the Special Assessment because it is subject to taxation under § 47-1005.01, an unpaid Special Assessment on such an interest or use shall be subject to the same penalty and interest provisions as a delinquent tax imposed under § 47-1005.01, and the unpaid Special Assessment shall be collected in the same manner and under the same conditions and subject to the same penalty as for an unpaid tax imposed under § 47-1005.01.

History

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-183, § 401(b), 57 DCR 3406
Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-262, § 103(b), 60 DCR 1300
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 101(a)(7), 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7102(a)(7), 7104, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-262 substituted “pursuant to § 47-1336” for “in the same manner and under the same conditions and subject to the same penalties as for unpaid real property taxes” in the last sentence of (c)(1).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have added (b-1).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (b-1).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(a)(5) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-342, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5691).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(a)(5) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-409, Aug. 1, 2014, 61 DCR 8281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7112(a)(7) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(a)(7) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(a), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(a)(7) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(a), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.